numbers.lexd
PATTERNS
One # 1
Root SmallSuf # 2-9

TenRoot SmallSuf # 10
TenRoot TeenSuf OneRoot # 11
TenRoot TeenSuf Root SmallSuf # 12-19

Root TenSuf SmallSuf # 20-90
Root TenSuf BigSuf Root SmallSuf # 22-99
Root TenSuf BigSuf OneRoot # 21-91

LEXICON OneRoot
себ # один

LEXICON One
себ
сей
сев
сер

LEXICON Root
чIе # два 
лъоб # три
бокьо #четыре тут должен быть апостроф 
инщду # пять
онлIи # шесть 
гьокьу # семь 
бийкьи # восемь в речи мужчин
бейкьи # восемь в речи женщин
гьочIо # девять

LEXICON TenRoot
гьоцIо # десять

LEXICON SmallSuf
<*1>:гу

LEXICON TeenSuf
<+10>:лIи

LEXICON TenSuf
<*10>:цIол

LEXICON BigSuf
<*10+>:логу
